Rhode Island, session 2025, SB737.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-1.3-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-1.3 entitled
"Expungement of Criminal Records" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-1.3-2. Motion for expungement.
(a) Any person who is a first offender may file a motion for the expungement of all records
and records of conviction for a felony or misdemeanor by filing a motion in the court in which the
conviction took place; provided, that no person who has been convicted of a crime of violence shall
have his or her records and records of conviction expunged; and provided, that all outstanding
court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments, charges, and/or any other monetary
obligations have been paid, unless such amounts are reduced or waived by order of the court.
(b) Notwithstanding § 12-1.3-1(3) (“first offender”), any person who has been convicted
of more than one misdemeanor, but fewer than six (6) misdemeanors, and has not been convicted
of a felony may file a motion for the expungement of any or all of those misdemeanors by filing a
motion in the court in which the convictions took place; provided that convictions for offenses
under chapter 29 of title 12, § 31-27-2 or § 31-27-2.1 are not eligible for and may not be expunged
under this subsection.
(c) Subject to subsection (a), a person may file a motion for the expungement of records
relating to a misdemeanor conviction after five (5) years from the date of the completion of his or
her sentence.
(d) Subject to subsection (a), a person may file a motion for the expungement of records

relating to a felony conviction after ten (10) years from the date of the completion of his or her
sentence.
(e) Subject to § 12-19-19(c), and without regard to subsections (a) through (c) of this
section, a person may file a motion for the expungement of records relating to a deferred sentence
upon its completion, after which the court will hold a hearing on the motion.
(f) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a person may file a motion for the expungement
of records relating to misdemeanor convictions after ten (10) years from the date of the completion
of their last sentence.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) through (f) of this section, a person
may file a motion for the expungement of records related to an offense that has been decriminalized
subsequent to the date of their conviction, after which the court will hold a hearing on the motion
in the court in which the original conviction took place.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001046
========
LC001046 - Page 2 of 3